West Virginia, session 2026, HB4145.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 34. school choice office. §5-34-1. Creation of school choice office. (a) Subject to legislative appropriation for this purpose, the Governor's office is authorized to create a school choice office with adequate personnel to assist students and parents participating in a school choice option.(b) The school choice office may coordinate with the Department of Education in providing students and parents with all available options for attending school in this state, including but limited to public schools, private and parochial schools, virtual schools, homeschool, learning pods, and micropods.(c) The office of school choice may utilize the statewide homeschool online portal as a means of providing students and parents with their available options.